test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-merkita_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - merkitä: # Verb 'to mean, / merkitä' - full paradigm
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: merkičen
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: merkičet
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: merkiččöy
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: merkičemmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: merkičettö
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: merkitäh
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: merkiče

     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: merkičin
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: merkičit
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: merkičči
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: merkičimmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: merkičittö
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: merkittih
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: merkinnyh
     merkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: merkitty

     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg1:  merkiččizin
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg2:  merkiččizit
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg3:  merkiččis
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl1:  merkiččizimmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl2:  merkiččizittö
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl3:  merkittäs
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: merkiččis
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:  merkittäs

     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg1:  merkinnyzin
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg2:  merkinnyzit
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg3:  merkinnys
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl1:  merkinnyzimmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl2:  merkinnyzittö
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl3:  merkitännys
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: merkinnys
     merkitä+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:  merkitännys

     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1:  merkinnen
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+Sg2:  merkinnet
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+Sg3:  merkinnöy
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+Pl1:  merkinnemmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+Pl2:  merkinnettö
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+Pl3:  merkitänneh
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: merkinne
     merkitä+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg+Pl3:  merkitänne

     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:  merkiče
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg3:  merkikkäh
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl1:  merkikkiämmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [merkikkiä, merkikkiättö]
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:  merkittähes
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: merkiče
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: merkikkäh
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl1: merkikkiämmö
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: merkikkiä
     merkitä+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: merkittähes


     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: merkiččii
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: merkiččijän
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [merkiččii, merkiččijän]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: merkiččijiä
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ess: merkiččijänny
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Tra: merkiččijäkse
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ine: merkiččijäs
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [merkiččijäspäi, merkiččijäs]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: merkiččijäh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ade: merkiččijäl
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [merkiččijälpäi, merkiččijäl]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+All: merkiččijäle
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Abe: merkiččijättäh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Com: merkiččijänke
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Prl: merkiččijäči
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: merkiččijät
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: merkiččijöin
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Acc: merkiččijät
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: merkiččijöi
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ess: merkiččijöinny
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Tra: merkiččijöikse
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ine: merkiččijöis
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [merkiččijöispäi, merkiččijöis]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: merkiččijöih
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ade: merkiččijöil
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [merkiččijöilpäi, merkiččijöil]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+All: merkiččijöile
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Abe: merkiččijöittäh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Com: merkiččijöinke
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Prl: merkiččijöiči
     merkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ins: merkiččijöin


     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: merkittävy
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: merkittävän
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Acc: [merkittävy, merkittävän]
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: merkittäviä
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ess: merkittävänny
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Tra: merkittäväkse
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ine: merkittäväs
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ela: [merkittäväspäi, merkittäväs]
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: merkittäväh
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ade: merkittäväl
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Abl: [merkittävälpäi, merkittäväl]
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+All: merkittäväle
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Abe: merkittävättäh
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Com: merkittävänke
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Prl: merkittäväči

     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: merkittävät
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: merkittävien
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Acc: merkittävät
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: merkittävii
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ess: merkittävinny
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Tra: merkittävikse
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ine: merkittävis
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ela: [merkittävispäi, merkittävis]
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: merkittävih
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ade: merkittävil
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Abl: [merkittävilpäi, merkittävil]
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+All: merkittävile
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Abe: merkittävittäh
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Com: merkittävienke
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Prl: merkittäviči
     merkitä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ins: merkittävin

     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: merkinnyh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: merkinnyön
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Acc: [merkinnyh, merkinnyön]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: merkinnytty
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ess: merkinnyönny
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Tra: merkinnyökse
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ine: merkinnyös
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ela: [merkinnyöspäi, merkinnyös]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: merkinnyöh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ade: merkinnyöl
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Abl: [merkinnyölpäi, merkinnyöl]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+All: merkinnyöle
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Abe: merkinnyöttäh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Com: merkinnyönke
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Prl: merkinnyöči

     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: merkinnyöt
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: merkinnyzien
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Acc: merkinnyöt
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: merkinnyzii
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ess: merkinnyzinny
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Tra: merkinnyzikse
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ine: merkinnyzis
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ela: [merkinnyzispäi, merkinnyzis]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: merkinnyzih
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ade: merkinnyzil
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Abl: [merkinnyzilpäi, merkinnyzil]
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+All: merkinnyzile
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Abe: merkinnyzittäh
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Com: merkinnyzienke
     merkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Prl: merkinnyziči
